California statutes. Financial Code
(d) “Noncore banking business” means all activities permissible for commercial banks, industrial banks, or trust companies, except core banking business, and except those activities prohibited by law or determined by the commissioner by regulation or order not to be noncore banking business.

(e) “Whole business unit” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 4840.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1671.

Each application filed with the commissioner under this chapter or under any regulation or order issued under this chapter shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall (if the commissioner requires by regulation or order) be verified in the manner that the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1672.

(a) Each foreign (other state) bank that maintains a facility or a California branch office shall file with the commissioner such reports as and when the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(b) Each report filed with the commissioner under this chapter or under any regulation or order issued under this chapter shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the
 manner, and shall (if the commissioner requires by regulation or order) be verified in the manner that the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1673.

Each foreign (other state) bank that maintains a facility (other than a foreign (other state) national bank that maintains a California branch office) and each foreign (other state) state bank that maintains a California branch office shall make, keep, and preserve at the facility or branch office or at another place that the commissioner may by regulation or order approve, the books, accounts, and other records relating to the business of the office, in the form, in the manner, and for
 the time that the commissioner may by regulation or order provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1674.

Fees shall be paid to and collected by the commissioner as follows:

(a) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank for approval to establish a facility is two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank that is licensed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 1710) to maintain a facility for approval to relocate or to close the facility is one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) The fee for issuing a license pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 1710) is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(d) Each foreign (other state) state bank that on June 1 of any year maintains one or more California branch offices shall pay, on or before the following July 1, a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per California branch office. However, the minimum fee paid by a foreign (other state) state bank under this subdivision shall be not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) and the maximum fee shall be not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(e) Each foreign (other state) bank that on June 1 of any year maintains a facility but no California branch office shall pay, on or before the following July 1, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each facility.

(f) If the commissioner makes an examination in connection with a pending application, as described in subdivision (a) or (b), the applicant shall pay a
 fee for the examination, as determined by the commissioner. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for all persons performing the examination, plus, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner.

(g) If the commissioner makes an examination of a foreign (other state) state bank that maintains a California branch office, the bank shall pay a fee for the examination, as determined by the commissioner. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for all persons performing the examination, plus, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner.

(h) If the commissioner makes an examination of a facility of an uninsured foreign (other state) bank licensed under Article 4 (commencing with Section 1710), the bank shall pay a fee for the examination, as determined by the commissioner. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for all persons performing the examination, plus, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner.

(i) If the commissioner makes an examination of a facility of an insured foreign (other state) bank that does not maintain a California branch office, the bank shall pay a fee for the examination, as determined by the commissioner. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for all persons performing the examination, plus, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 9.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1675.

(a) Any foreign (other state) state bank is exempted from the restrictions of Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution relating to rates of interest upon the loan or forbearance of any money, goods, or things in action or on accounts after demand.

(b) This section does not exempt a foreign (other state) state bank or any subsidiary from complying with all other laws and regulations
 governing the business in which the bank or subsidiary is engaged.

(c) This section creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1676.

(a) In this section, “subject bank” means a bank organized under the laws of any territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, or the Northern Mariana Islands.

(b) Nothing in this chapter, except subdivision (c), applies to a subject bank that, as a foreign (other nation) bank, maintains an office in this state
 licensed under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1750) or a federal agency (as defined in Section 1750) or federal branch (as defined in Section 1750) in this state.

(c) No subject bank may at the same time maintain (1) as a foreign (other state) state bank, an office in this state and (2) as a foreign (other nation) bank, an office in this state licensed under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1750) or a federal agency (as defined in Section 1750) or federal branch (as defined in Section 1750) in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Branch Offices [1680. - 1688.]

1680.

No foreign (other state) state bank may transact core banking business in this state except at a branch office established in accordance with federal law and the law of the domicile of the bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1681.

Section 1680 does not prohibit:

(a) Any foreign (other state) state bank that does not maintain a California branch office from carrying on the activities described in subdivision (d) of Section 191 of the Corporations Code.

(b) Any foreign (other state) state bank that does not maintain a California branch office from making, in this state, loans secured by
 liens on real property located in this state.

(c) Any foreign (other state) state bank from having a California state bank as its agent pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 800).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1682.

No foreign (other state) bank may establish or maintain a California branch office unless it is qualified to transact intrastate business in this state under Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1683.

No foreign (other state) bank may establish or maintain a California branch office unless the bank is insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1684.

(a) (1) No foreign (other state) bank may merge as the surviving corporation with a California bank, except that an insured foreign (other state) bank may do so in accordance with federal law, the law of the domicile of the foreign (other state) bank, this chapter, and Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800).

(2) No foreign (other state) bank may purchase the whole business
 unit of a California bank, except that an insured foreign (other state) bank may do so in accordance with federal law, the law of the domicile of the foreign (other state) bank, this chapter, and Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800).

(3) No foreign (other state) bank that does not already maintain a California branch office may establish or maintain a California branch office except in the manner described in paragraph (1) or (2) and in accordance with federal law, the law of the domicile of the foreign (other state) bank, and this chapter.

(b) This section constitutes:

(1) An election to permit early interstate merger transactions pursuant to Section 44(a)(3) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(a)(3)).

(2) An express
 prohibition against interstate branching through the acquisition of a branch business unit located in this state of a California bank (without acquisition of the whole business unit of the California bank) pursuant to Section 44(a)(4) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(a)(4)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1685.

(a) No foreign (other state) bank that does not already maintain a California branch office may:

(1) Merge as the surviving bank with a California bank pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1684, unless the California bank has been in existence for at least five years.

(2) Purchase the whole business unit of a California
 bank pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1684 unless the California bank has been in existence for at least five years.

(b) For purposes of this section, a California bank that is established solely for the purpose of, and does not open for business prior to, acquiring the whole business unit of a second California bank through a merger or purchase is deemed to have been in existence for the same period of time as the second California bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1686.

The minimum age requirement set forth in Section 1685 does not apply in any case in which the factor set forth in subdivision (a) and any of the factors set forth in subdivision (b) apply.

(a) The foreign (other state) bank, by itself or in concurrent transactions with other depository corporations (as defined in Section 4805.06), acquires the whole business unit of the California bank or, if the California bank has been
 closed or placed in conservatorship, all or substantially all of the insured deposits of the California bank.

(b) (1) If the California bank is a national bank, one of the following:

(A) The bank is in default or in danger of default, as defined in Section 3(x) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813(x)).

(B) The purchase or merger is one with respect to which the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation provides assistance under Section 13(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1823(c)).

(2) If the California bank is a state bank, one of the following:

(A) The commissioner has taken possession of the property and business of the bank
 pursuant to Section 592.

(B) The purchase or merger is one with respect to which the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation provides assistance under Section 13(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1823(c)).

(C) The commissioner finds that one or more of the factors listed in Section 592 exists and that imposing the minimum age requirement of Section 3825 is not in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1687.

(a) In case a foreign (other state) state bank that maintains a California branch office is a commercial bank, in addition to other provisions of this division and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) that are otherwise applicable to the bank, the following provisions of this division apply to the bank with respect to its business in this state as if the bank were a California state commercial bank:

(1) Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1320).

(2) Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1400).

(3) Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1450).

(4) Sections 1487, 1488, 1514, 1520, and 1522.

(5) Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 1620).

(b) In case a foreign (other state) state bank that maintains a California branch office is an industrial bank, in addition to other provisions of this division and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) that are otherwise applicable to the bank, the provisions cited in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and the provisions of Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 1530) apply to the industrial bank with respect to its business in
 this state as if the bank were a California state industrial bank.

(c) In case a foreign (other state) state bank that maintains a California branch office is authorized pursuant to the law of its domicile to transact trust business, in addition to other provisions of this division and Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) that are otherwise applicable to the bank, the following provisions of Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 1550) apply to the bank with respect to its business in this state as if the bank were a California state bank authorized to transact trust business:

(1) Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570). For purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570), the bank’s principal place of business is deemed to be situated in the city in which its California branch office is located or, if it maintains California branch offices in two or more cities, in the city
 with the largest population.

(2) Article 4 (commencing with Section 1580), except Section 1580.

(3) Article 5 (commencing with Section 1600), except Sections 1583, 1584, 1585, 1588, and 1590.

(d) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (d), in case a foreign (other state) state bank that maintains a California branch office is authorized pursuant to the law of its domicile to transact trust business, the bank may engage in and conduct trust business in this state and may be appointed by any court to act in any fiduciary capacity in which a California state trust company is authorized to act.

(e) No foreign (other state) state bank that maintains a California branch office may transact at the branch office any business that it is not authorized to
 transact or is prohibited from transacting under the law of its domicile or that banks organized under the laws of this state are not authorized to transact or are prohibited from transacting.

(f) Whenever any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order issued under this chapter that is applicable to or with respect to a foreign (other state) state bank that maintains a California branch office is inconsistent with any provision of any other chapter of this division, the former provision applies, and the latter provision does not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1688.

Notwithstanding Section 1684, a foreign (other state) bank that does not maintain offices in California may merge with or purchase the whole business unit of a foreign (other state) bank that already maintains one or more offices in California in accordance with Section 1684 pursuant to federal law and the law of the domicile of the surviving or purchasing bank. The surviving or purchasing bank may retain the offices established in this state by the disappearing or selling bank.
 Thereafter, the surviving or purchasing bank may establish and maintain additional offices as if it were the disappearing or selling bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Facilities of Insured Foreign (Other State) Banks [1700. - 1705.]

1700.

No provision of this article applies to an insured foreign (other state) bank that maintains a California branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.

(a) No insured foreign (other state) bank may establish or maintain an office in this state at which it engages in noncore banking business unless the bank complies with this article and applicable provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1670).

(b) (1) No person may establish or maintain an office in this state as representative of an insured foreign (other state) bank
 unless the bank complies with this article and applicable provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1670).

(2) For purposes of this article, if any person establishes or maintains an office in this state as representative of an insured foreign (other state) bank, the insured foreign (other state) bank is deemed to establish and maintain the office as a facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.

Not less than 30 days before an insured foreign (other state) bank establishes a facility, the bank shall file with the commissioner a report and the appointment required pursuant to Section 1703.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 41.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.

(a) Not less than 30 days before establishing a facility, an insured foreign (other state) bank shall file with the commissioner, in the form that the commissioner may by regulation or order require, an appointment irrevocably appointing the commissioner and the commissioner’s successor from time to time in office to be the bank’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the bank or any of its
 successors that arises out of the activities in this state of the facility after the appointment has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the bank or its successors, as the case may be.

(b) Any insured foreign (other state) bank that maintains a facility and that has not filed with the commissioner an appointment pursuant to subdivision (a) is deemed by the maintenance of the facility to have appointed the commissioner as its attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the bank or any of its successors that arises out of the activities in this state of the facility, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the bank or its successor, as the case may be.

(c) Service may be made on an uninsured foreign (other state) bank that has appointed or is deemed to have
 appointed the commissioner as its attorney for service of process by leaving a copy of the process at any office of the commissioner. However, the service is not effective unless (1) the party making the service, who may be the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the bank served at the last address on file with the commissioner for any of the bank’s offices in this state or at its head office, and (2) an affidavit of compliance with this subdivision by the party making the service is filed in the case on or before the return date, if any, or within any further time that the court, in the case of a judicial proceeding, or the administrative agency, in the case of an administrative proceeding, allows.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.

Not less than 30 days before an insured foreign (other state) bank relocates a facility, it shall file a report with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.

Not less than 30 days before an insured foreign (other state) bank closes a facility, it shall file a report with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Facilities of Uninsured Foreign (Other State) Banks [1710. - 1721.]

1710.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Controlling person,” when used with respect to an uninsured foreign (other state) bank, means any person who directly or indirectly controls the bank. For purposes of this subdivision, “control” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1250, and “person” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 1250.

(b) “Executive officer,” when used with respect to an uninsured foreign (other state) bank or a controlling person of an uninsured foreign (other state) bank, means the chief executive officer, the chief operating officer, the chief financial officer, and any other person who participates or has authority to participate in major policymaking functions of the bank or controlling person.

(c) (1) “License” means a license issued under this article, authorizing an uninsured foreign (other state) bank to maintain a facility.

(2) “Licensed” means to be issued or to hold a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1711.

(a) In this section, “act” includes (without limitation) omission.

(b) For purposes of making findings on an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank for approval to establish a facility:

(1) The commissioner may, in the absence of credible evidence to the contrary, presume that the directors, executive officers, and any
 controlling person of the bank, the directors and executive officers of any controlling person of the bank, and the members of the proposed management of the facility are each of good character and sound financial standing.

(2) The commissioner may find that the bank, a director, executive officer, or controlling person of the bank, a director or executive officer of a controlling person of the bank, or any member of the proposed management of the facility is not of good character if the person has done any of the following:

(A) Has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, any crime involving an act of fraud or dishonesty.

(B) Has consented to or suffered a judgment in any civil action based upon conduct involving an act of fraud or dishonesty.

(C) Has consented to or suffered the suspension or revocation of any professional, occupational, or vocational license based upon conduct involving an act of fraud or dishonesty.

(D) Has willfully made or caused to be made in any application or report filed with the commissioner or in any proceeding before the commissioner any statement that was at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it was made false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or has willfully omitted to state in any such application or report any material fact that was required to be stated in the application or report.

(E) Has willfully committed any violation of, or has willfully aided, abetted, counseled, commanded, induced, or procured the violation by any other person of, any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(c) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) is not an exclusive list of the grounds upon which the commissioner may find, for purposes of making findings on an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank for approval to establish a facility, that the bank, a director, executive officer, or controlling person of the bank, a director or executive officer of a controlling person of the bank, or any member of the proposed management of the facility is not of good character.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1712.

(a) No uninsured foreign (other state) bank may establish or maintain an office in this state at which it engages in noncore banking business unless the uninsured foreign (other state) bank is licensed to maintain the office as a facility.

(b) (1) No person may establish or maintain an office in this state as representative of an uninsured foreign (other state) bank unless the
 uninsured foreign (other state) bank is licensed to maintain the office as a facility.

(2) For purposes of this article, if any person establishes or maintains an office in this state as representative of an uninsured foreign (other state) bank, the uninsured foreign (other state) bank is deemed to establish and maintain the office as a facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1713.

(a) No uninsured foreign (other state) bank may establish or maintain a facility unless the commissioner has first approved the establishment of the office and issued a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office.

(b) If the commissioner finds all the following with respect to an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank for approval to establish a facility, the commissioner shall
 approve the application:

(1) The bank, any controlling person of the bank, the directors and executive officers of the bank or of any controlling person of the bank, and the proposed management of the office are each of good character and sound financial standing.

(2) The financial history and condition of the bank are satisfactory.

(3) The management of the bank and the proposed management of the office are adequate.

(4) It is reasonable to believe that, if licensed to maintain the office, the bank will operate the office in compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, and orders.

(5) The bank’s establishment and maintenance of the office will promote the public convenience and
 advantage.

(6) The activities in which the bank proposes to engage at the office are noncore banking business and do not constitute core banking business.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank for approval to establish a facility has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.

(a) No uninsured foreign (other state) bank that is licensed to maintain a facility may relocate the office unless the commissioner has first approved the relocation and issued a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office at the new site.

(b) If the commissioner finds the following with respect to an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank for approval to relocate a facility,
 the commissioner shall approve the application:

(1) In case the new site of the office is in the same vicinity as the old site, that the relocation of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience.

(2) In case the new site of the office is not in the same vicinity as the old site, both of the following:

(A) The relocation of the office from the old site will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage in the area that is primarily served by the office at the old site.

(B) The relocation of the office to the new site will promote the public convenience and advantage.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank for approval to relocate a facility has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing the bank to maintain the office at the new site have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue the license.

(d) Promptly after an uninsured foreign (other state) bank that is licensed to maintain a facility relocates the office, the bank shall surrender to the commissioner the license that authorized it to maintain the office at the old site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1715.

An uninsured foreign (other state) bank that is licensed to maintain a facility may, subject to any regulations that the commissioner may prescribe, engage in any noncore banking business at the office but may not solicit deposits, receive deposits, pay checks, make loans, or otherwise conduct core banking business at the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1716.

(a) (1) No uninsured foreign (other state) bank that is licensed to maintain a facility may close the office unless the commissioner has first approved the closing.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not prohibit an uninsured foreign (other state) bank that is licensed to maintain a facility from closing the office in accordance with Section 1717.

(b) If the commissioner finds, with respect to an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank for approval to close a facility, that the closing of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, the commissioner shall approve the application. If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by an uninsured foreign (other state) bank for approval to close a facility has been approved and all conditions precedent to the closing have been fulfilled, the bank may close the office and shall promptly thereafter surrender to the commissioner the license that authorized it to maintain the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1717.

(a) Any uninsured foreign (other state) bank that holds a license to maintain a facility may voluntarily surrender the license by filing the license and a report with the commissioner. However, any uninsured foreign (other state) bank that holds licenses to maintain two or more facilities may not voluntarily surrender fewer than all of the licenses.

(b) (1) Except as provided in
 paragraph (2), a voluntary surrender of a license is effective on the 30th day after the license and the report called for in subdivision (a) are filed with the commissioner, or on any earlier date that the commissioner may by order specify.

(2) If a proceeding to revoke or suspend a license is pending when the license and the report called for in subdivision (a) are filed with the commissioner, or if a proceeding to revoke or suspend a license or to impose conditions upon the surrender of a license is instituted before the 30th day after the license and the report called for in subdivision (a) are filed with the commissioner, the voluntary surrender of the license is effective at the time and upon the conditions that the commissioner may by order specify.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1718.

(a) (1) No uninsured foreign (other state) bank may be issued a license to maintain a facility unless it has first filed with the commissioner, in the form that the commissioner may by regulation or order require, an appointment irrevocably appointing the commissioner and the commissioner’s successor from time to time in office as the bank’s attorney to receive service of process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against
 the bank or any of its successors that arises out of the activities in this state of the facility after the appointment has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the bank or its successors, as the case may be.

(2) Any uninsured foreign (other state) bank that maintains a facility and that has not filed with the commissioner an appointment pursuant to paragraph (1) is deemed by the maintenance of the facility to have appointed the commissioner and the commissioner’s successor from time to time in office as its attorney to receive service of any lawful process in a noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the bank or any of its successors that arises out of the activities in this state of the facility with the same force and validity as if served personally on the bank or its successors, as the case may be.

(b) Service may be made
 on an uninsured foreign (other state) bank that has appointed or is deemed to have appointed the commissioner as its attorney for service of process by leaving a copy of the process at an office of the commissioner. However, the service is not effective unless (1) the party making the service, who may be the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the bank served at the last address on file with the commissioner for any of its offices in this state or at its head office, and (2) an affidavit of compliance with this subdivision by the party making the service is filed in the case on or before the return date, if any, or within any further time that the court, in the case of a judicial proceeding, or the administrative agency, in the case of an administrative proceeding, allows.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1719.

Each uninsured foreign (other state) bank that is licensed to maintain a facility shall assign to the office a popular name that includes the term “facility” and that consists of a specific designation by name or number. The bank shall post the popular name and the name of the bank in a conspicuous place at the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.

Each uninsured foreign (other state) bank that is licensed to maintain a facility shall post its license in a conspicuous place at the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1721.

No license is transferable or assignable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 20. Foreign (Other Nation) Banks [1750. - 1835.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1750. - 1768.]

1750.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Agency” means a depositary agency or a nondepositary agency.

(b) “Branch office” means a limited branch office, a retail branch office, or a wholesale branch office.

(c) “Business in this state,” when used with respect to a foreign
 (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain one or more agencies or branch offices, includes (without limitation) the aggregate business of all the offices.

(d) “Controlling person,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means any person who, directly or indirectly, controls the bank. For purposes of this subdivision, “control” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1250, and “person” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 1250.

(e) “Depositary agency,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means a place in this state at which the bank transacts commercial banking business but at which it does not transact the business of receiving deposits, except as permitted under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1805.

(f) “Executive officer,”
 when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank or a controlling person of a foreign (other nation) bank, means the chief executive officer, the chief operating officer, the chief financial officer, and any other person who participates or has authority to participate in major policymaking functions of the bank or controlling person. “Executive officer,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, includes the head of the international division (or, if there is no such division, the closest equivalent division or unit) of such bank.

(g) “Federal agency” has the meaning set forth in Section 1(b) of the International Banking Act of 1978.

(h) “Federal branch” has the meaning set forth in Section 1(b) of the International Banking Act of 1978.

(i) (1) “License” means a license
 issued under this chapter, authorizing a foreign bank to maintain an office.

(2) To be “licensed” means to be issued or to hold a license.

(3) To be “licensed to transact business in this state,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means that the bank is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office.

(j) “Limited branch office,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means a place in this state at which the bank transacts commercial banking business but at which it does not transact the business of receiving deposits except as permitted under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1805.

(k) “Nondepositary agency,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means a place in this state at which